Hawaii, session 2026, SB529.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the department of education's program -- Hoakea:  mauka to makai navigating our future -- is designed to educate students by integrating core educational concepts in math, science, social studies, civics, leadership, language, and literacy with cultural practices and traditions in aina (land) and community settings.  In partnership with the Polynesian Voyaging Society, the Hoakea program is designed to connect school communities with the values and mission of malama honua (care for the earth).  Lesson plans also integrate environmental stewardship, climate change, Native Hawaiian practices, responsibility to care for community, total well-being, and a sense of place. The legislature also finds that Hokulea's Moananuiakea voyage to "ignite a movement of ten million 'planetary navigators' who will pursue critical and inspiring 'voyages' to ensure a better future for the earth" aligns with the department of education's priorities as articulated in the 2023-2029 strategic plan:  "that every student in Hawaiʻi's public school system  regardless of their geographic location, background, economic standing or whether they are in English or Hawaiian language pathways  must have the opportunity to discover and pursue their passions and see first-hand how their interests can translate into successful and meaningful careers that positively impact Hawaiʻi's future and our global society.  We envision a [kindergarten through grade twelve] public education system that prepares all graduates to be [g]lobally [c]ompetitive, [l]ocally [c]ommitted.  That means our students not only have the academic knowledge and skills to thrive and be successful, but also possess that special sense of responsibility to give back to our communities and island home". When educational content is relevant to the student's home and culture, students become more engaged and curious about the lessons taught.  In addition, indigenous knowledge and practices are a key source to understanding climate change because it provides a deep understanding of local ecosystems.  Indigenous knowledge can include early warning signs of environmental shifts and offer insight on sustainable land management practices developed through generations of living in harmony with nature.  Incorporation of modern and indigenous knowledge allows for more effective adaptation and mitigation strategies against climate change impacts. Presently, Native Hawaiian and Pacific Islander students have a disproportionately high rate of absenteeism and lower educational achievement.  Na Hopena Ao, a department-wide framework to develop skills, behaviors, and dispositions that honor the qualities and values of the indigenous language and culture of Hawaii, provides schools with values to enrich student learning, promote emotional and physical well-being, and a strengthened sense of place and belonging.  Recognizing that the board of education formally adopted Na Hopena Ao as a policy in 2015, the department has prioritized Na Hopena Ao in its current strategic plan.  By making educational material more relevant and engaging, including the creation of conditions that make students feel safe and honors their heritage and culture, students are naturally more engaged and excited about learning.  Through the establishment of a Na Hopena Ao environment for learning, the legislature believes that not only will students graduate prepared for college and careers, but also for community and civic engagement. The legislature believes these lessons will endure as students become leaders, stewards, and critical thinkers when they become graduates and begin navigating the world. The legislature further finds that the Polynesian Voyaging Society and the ohana of waa (canoe) were established as organizations with educational missions to engage students in learning through indigenous voyaging practices.  Recognizing that Pacific Islander and Native Hawaiian students represent a significant proportion of students who attend public schools, incorporation of authentic learning experiences like waa and aina provides students with culturally relevant education.  Further, educators and principals have responded to the growing demand for educational programs aligned with Na Hopena Ao by partnering with organizations to start a program within the department of education called Hoakea. Over the past two years the department of education has partnered with the ohana (family) of waa and aina organizations in communities where its schools are located to design and deliver engaging and rigorous, authentic learning experiences for its students in a variety of delivery methods.  The first includes Hoakea, which connects students and teachers with their community's waa and local aina organizations to teach Hawaiian navigation and voyaging, moolelo (stories), and history.  The second includes student-focused authentic learning experiences that occur in spaces outside the formal classroom setting and out of school time such as after school, or during the summer, spring, and winter breaks.  These experiences further reinforce traditional classroom work with authentic real-world situations in local communities.  The third includes teacher-focused professional development opportunities to connect cultural lesson plans in ainao -based settings. Since its inception, the Hoakea program has reached over three thousand two hundred students, nearly one thousand three hundred teachers, and engaged more than fifty organizations across the State.  There is increasing demand from schools for aina-based learning experiences.  However, the department of education cannot meet this growing demand with existing resources.  Therefore, the legislature believes that with sufficient funding, the Hoakea program can triple its engagement with students and aina-based educational opportunities. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the department of education for it to expand its Hoakea program. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $4,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the expansion and continuation of the Hoakea program. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________